Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.848

[Art. 137] Sections to be explained.

(1) RCW 38.38.008, 38.38.012, 38.38.064 through 38.38.132, 38.38.252, 38.38.260, 38.38.372, 38.38.480, 38.38.624 through * 38.38.792, and 38.38.848 through 38.38.860 shall be carefully explained to every enlisted member:

(a) At the time of the member's enlistment or transfer or induction;

(b) At the time of the member's order to duty in or with any of the organized militia; or

(c) Within forty days thereafter.

(2) These sections shall also be explained again to each member of the organized militia each time a member of the organized militia reenlists or extends his or her enlistment.

(3) A complete text of this code and of the regulations prescribed by the governor thereunder shall be made available to any member of the organized militia, upon request, for personal examination.

[ 2009 c 378 s 30; 1989 c 48 s 74; 1963 c 220 s 122.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 38.38.792 was recodified as RCW 38.38.783 by the code reviser September 2009.